Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Chapter 1. General Assembly and Officers Thereof.

§ 30-1.
Time and place of meeting of General Assembly.

The General Assembly shall meet in regular session on the second Wednesday in January of each year. It shall sit at the Capitol in the City of Richmond, but may adjourn to any other place.

The General Assembly may, by joint resolution, direct the holding of such session or sessions in the Restored Capitol at Williamsburg, Virginia, as to it may seem proper.

History.

Code 1919, § 294; 1934, p. 99; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 22.

Cross references.

For general constitutional provisions, see Va. Const., Art. IV, § 1 et seq.

For provision relating to meetings, see Va. Const., Art. IV, § 6.

§ 30-2.
Meeting at place appointed by Governor.

If the General Assembly cannot safely meet at the place prescribed by law, or to which it has adjourned, because of a public enemy, or any dangerous contagious disease, or for any other cause, it may meet at such other place as the Governor shall appoint, of which he shall give notice by proclamation.

History.

Code 1919, § 295.

§ 30-3.
How convened in extra session.

Whenever two-thirds of the members of both houses of the General Assembly shall, after their adjournment sine die, desire to convene the same in conformity to the Constitution, they shall make application in writing to the Governor over their own signatures, and this shall be deemed by him a proper application. He shall thereupon convene the General Assembly, at such time and place as shall be designated by the application; or, if the time and place be not so designated, then at such convenient and reasonable time and place as he shall appoint.

History.

Code 1919, § 296.

§ 30-4.
Civil proceedings for or against members, clerks or clerks’ assistants, or the Lieutenant Governor during session.

Any action, suit or other civil proceeding, either in favor of or against a member of the General Assembly, or the clerks thereof, or the clerks’ full-time assistants, the sergeant-at-arms of the Senate or House, or the Lieutenant Governor, may be commenced, but shall not, unless by their consent, be prosecuted to final judgment or decree during the session of the General Assembly. In addition, no such person shall be compelled in any civil proceeding to appear or to answer or respond, in person or in writing, nor shall any such person be taken into custody or imprisoned during the session of the General Assembly, or during the fifteen days next before the beginning or after the ending of any session.

History.

Code 1919, § 297; 1997, c. 471.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1997, c. 471, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act [which amended §§ 30-4, 30-6, and 30-7] are declarative of existing law.”

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 4 Process. § 4.04 Persons Exempt from Service of Process and Civil Arrest. Friend.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2A M.J. Arrest, § 2; 8A M.J. Exemptions from Execution and Attachment, § 25.

§ 30-5.
Continuance or time for filing pleading, etc., where party or attorney is connected with General Assembly or Division of Legislative Services.

Any party to an action or proceeding in any court, including the Court of Appeals and the Supreme Court of Virginia, commission or other tribunal having judicial or quasi-judicial powers or jurisdiction who is an officer, employee or member or member-elect of the General Assembly or employee of the Division of Legislative Services, or who has, prior to or during the session of the General Assembly, employed or retained to represent him in such action or proceeding an attorney who is or becomes an officer, employee or member or member-elect of the General Assembly or employee of the Division of Legislative Services, shall be entitled to a continuance as a matter of right (i) during the period beginning 30 days prior to the commencement of the session and ending 30 days after the adjournment thereof, and (ii) during a period beginning one day prior to the meeting date of any reconvened or veto session or of any commission, council, committee or subcommittee created by the General Assembly at which such officer, employee or member is scheduled to attend and ending one day after the adjournment of such meeting; however, no continuance need be granted under clause (ii) unless it shall have been requested in writing at least three days prior to the first day for which the continuance is sought and filed with the court. The requesting party, when practicable, shall strive to notify all other parties to the proceeding of such request.

Any pleading or the performance of any act relating thereto required to be filed or performed by any statute or rule during the period beginning 30 days prior to the commencement of the session and ending 30 days after the adjournment of the session shall be extended until not less than 30 days after any such session. The failure of any court, commission or other tribunal to allow such continuance when requested so to do or the returning of such filing or act during the period hereinabove specified shall constitute reversible error; provided that this section shall not prevent the granting of temporary injunctive relief, or the dissolution or extension of a temporary injunction, but the right to such relief shall remain in the sound discretion of the court or other such tribunal.

History.

Code 1919, § 298; 1926, p. 18; 1934, p. 370; 1940, p. 363; 1952, c. 234; 1960, c. 147; 1973, cc. 242, 322; 1984, c. 703; 1987, c. 192; 2002, cc. 584, 617; 2012, c. 394.

Cross references.

As to membership, terms, compensation and staff of the Virginia Code Commission, see § 30-145.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 584 and 617 are identical, and, in the first paragraph, near the end of the first sentence, substituted “however” for “provided,” inserted “clause” preceding the second occurrence of “(ii),” inserted “in writing” following “requested,” substituted “the” for “such” preceding “continuance is sought,” and added “and filed with the court” to the end, and added the present last sentence.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 394 substituted “member or member-elect of the General Assembly or employee” for “member of the General Assembly, employee” and “who is or becomes an officer, employee or member or member-elect of the General Assembly or employee” for “who is an officer, employee or member of the General Assembly, or employee” near the middle of the first sentence of the first paragraph; and substituted “30 days” for “thirty days” throughout the section.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on practice and pleading in the year 1971-72, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 1309 (1972).

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 6 Pleading. § 6.03 Defendant’s Pleadings. Bryson.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 6 Pleadings Generally. § 6.08 Time of Filing Pleadings; Chapter 16 Continuances. § 16.02 Continuance of Right: Legislators and Legislative Officials. Friend.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 2-1101 Motion for Continuance. No. 2-1301 Juror Qualification Form.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4A M.J. Continuances, §§ 3, 14, 15; 11B M.J. Jury, § 16; 14B M.J. Pleading, § 5; 15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions, § 30.

§ 30-6.
Privilege of members, clerks and clerks’ assistants, and Lieutenant Governor from arrest.

During the session of the General Assembly, and for five days before and after the session, members of the General Assembly, the clerks thereof and the clerks’ full-time assistants, and the sergeants-at-arms of the Senate and House shall be privileged from being taken into custody or imprisoned under any process except as provided in § 30-7; nor shall such persons for such periods of time be subject to process as a witness in any case, civil or criminal. The provisions of this section shall be applicable to the Lieutenant Governor during his attendance at sessions of the General Assembly and while going to and from such sessions.

History.

Code 1919, § 299; 1958, c. 29; 1975, c. 427; 1997, c. 471.

Cross references.

For constitutional provision, see Va. Const., Art. IV, § 9.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1997, c. 471, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act [which amended §§ 30-4, 30-6, and 30-7] are declarative of existing law.”

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 4 Process. § 4.04 Persons Exempt from Service of Process and Civil Arrest. Friend.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2A M.J. Arrest, § 2.

§ 30-7.
Members, clerks, assistants, etc., subject to arrest for criminal offenses.

Any member of the General Assembly, any clerk thereof or his assistants, the Lieutenant Governor or the sergeant-at-arms of the Senate or the House who is alleged to have committed a criminal offense as defined in §

18.2-8

, shall be subject at any time to be charged, arrested, prosecuted and imprisoned for such offense.

History.

Code 1919, § 300; 1975, c. 427; 1997, c. 471.

Cross references.

For constitutional provision, see Va. Const., Art. IV, § 9.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1997, c. 471, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act [which amended §§ 30-4, 30-6, and 30-7] are declarative of existing law.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2A M.J. Arrest, § 2.

§ 30-8.
Member must obey writ of habeas corpus.

Any court or judge awarding a writ of habeas corpus, directed to a member of the General Assembly, shall have power to compel obedience to such writ.

History.

Code 1919, § 301.

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 4 Process. § 4.04 Persons Exempt from Service of Process and Civil Arrest; Chapter 33 Writs and Injunctions. § 33.01 Writs. Friend.

§ 30-9.
Privilege of members for words spoken or written.

No member or former member of the General Assembly shall be arrested or imprisoned for or on account of any words spoken or written or any proceedings had in either house; but nothing herein shall in any respect restrict the power which each house of the General Assembly has over its respective members.

History.

Code 1919, § 302.

Cross references.

For constitutional provision, see Va. Const., Art IV, § 9.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

12A M.J. Libel and Slander, § 19.

§ 30-10.
Attendance of witnesses; production of evidence.

When the Senate or House of Delegates, a joint committee or commission thereof, or any committee of either house authorized to send for persons and papers, shall order the attendance of any witness, or the production of any paper as evidence, a summons shall be issued accordingly by the clerk of such house, directed to the sheriff or other officer of any county or city, or the chief officer of the Virginia Capitol Police, or his designee, and, when served, obedience thereto may be enforced by attachment, fine and imprisonment in jail, at the discretion of the house which, or the committee of which, caused the summons to issue, or in the case of a joint committee or commission, at the discretion of such joint committee or commission or as the two houses may determine by joint resolution.

History.

Code 1919, § 303; 1958, c. 608; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 155; 2003, c. 231.

Cross references.

As to a board of visitors having authority to send for persons and papers or order the attendance of witnesses while investigating the management of an institution or the conduct of any of its officers or employees, see §

2.2-2105

.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 231 inserted “or commission” following “joint committee” in two places, deleted “or committee” following “such house,” and substituted “city, or the chief officer of the Virginia Capitol Police, or his designee” for “corporation.”

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 9 Discovery. § 9.08 Production of documents and things. Bryson.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

17 M.J. State, § 4.

§ 30-11.
Who to administer oaths to witnesses.

The oaths to be taken by any witness examined before such house or committee may be administered by the speaker of the house, chairman of the committee, or the clerk of the house or of the committee.

History.

Code 1919, § 304.

§ 30-12.
Duties of officers of each house.

The several officers of each house of the General Assembly shall perform such duties as shall be required of them by their respective houses.

History.

Code 1919, § 305.

§ 30-13.
Other duties of Clerk of House of Delegates; publication of proposed amendments to Constitution.

In addition to such duties as may be prescribed by the rules of the House of Delegates, the Clerk of the House of Delegates shall at the end of the session of the General Assembly prepare a well-arranged index to the journal of the House and the documents printed during the session by order of the House. He shall have published, with the acts and joint resolutions proposing amendments to the Constitution: joint resolutions providing for studies for legislation of each session of the General Assembly; the unadjusted United States decennial census counts for the Commonwealth’s counties, cities, and towns; and a carefully prepared and well-arranged index of the acts and joint resolutions.

The Clerk of the House of Delegates shall have published all proposed amendments to the Constitution for distribution from his office and to the clerk of the circuit court of each county and city two copies of the proposed amendments, one of which shall be posted at the front door of the courthouse and the other shall be made available for public inspection. Every clerk of the circuit court shall complete the posting required not later than three months prior to the next ensuing general election of members of the House of Delegates and shall certify such posting to the Clerk of the House of Delegates. The Clerk of the House of Delegates shall report to the General Assembly at its next regular session the action taken by him under this section, including the costs incurred in the printing and distribution of the amendments. The report shall be published in the Journal of the House of Delegates.

History.

Code 1919, § 306; 1920, p. 396; 1927, p. 211; 1940, p. 471; 1946, p. 171; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 84; 1969, Ex. Sess., c. 13; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 71; 1976, c. 170; 1993, c. 399; 1994, c. 623; 2005, c. 839.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 839, effective October 1, 2005, rewrote the section.

§ 30-14.
Clerk to be Keeper of the Rolls; other duties.

The Clerk of the House of Delegates shall be the Keeper of Rolls of the Commonwealth. He shall enroll all of the acts of the General Assembly and joint resolutions proposing amendments to the Constitution by such other permanent and substantial method or methods as he may deem proper; and shall have the enrolled acts bound for publication after they have been signed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates and the President of the Senate.

The Clerk of the House of Delegates shall have the custody of the acts and joint resolutions of the General Assembly, and the records of the House of Delegates; and, when required, shall furnish a copy of any or any part of any of them, or of any section or sections of the Code in the form published pursuant to § 30-148; which copy, being certified by him shall be evidence for any purpose for which the original would be received, and with as much effect. If an act or part of an act of the General Assembly has been codified and assigned a section number as a part of the Code of Virginia, by the Virginia Code Commission pursuant to § 30-148, he may also certify that fact.

He shall, as soon as practicable after every act is passed, prepare the acts for publication with a notation of the day upon which every act was approved by the Governor or became law without his approval. He shall furnish to the Director of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems the manuscript of all acts of the General Assembly and joint resolutions proposing amendments to the Constitution and joint resolutions providing for studies for legislation, or a copy thereof, properly arranged for publication. As soon as practicable after the adjournment of the General Assembly, he shall furnish the index and the tables required by law and the date of adjournment of the session, and shall superintend the publication of such acts, joint resolutions, resolutions, date of adjournment, tables and index, in connection with the Director of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems.

History.

Code 1919, § 307; 1940, p. 472; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 84; 1970, c. 170; 1994, c. 623; 2005, c. 839.

Cross references.

As to reenrollment of bills amended in accordance with recommendation of Governor, see § 30-14.2.

As to authority of Keeper of the Rolls to correct typographical errors, etc., in bills, see § 30-14.3.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 839, effective October 1, 2005, rewrote the section.

§ 30-14.01.
Certifying copy of act; fee.

The Clerk of the House of Delegates shall charge for certifying a copy of an Act of Assembly the sum of five dollars.

History.

Code 1950, § 14-115; 1964, c. 386, § 14.1-104; 1989, c. 186; 1998, c. 872.

§ 30-14.1.
Enrollment of act to codify the laws; printing and distribution.

The provisions of § 30-14, concerning the manner and method of enrollment of the acts of the General Assembly shall not apply to an act to codify the laws of the Commonwealth. In the case of such legislation the bill itself or a copy thereof, with all amendments to such bill, if any there be, incorporated therein, or with such amendments or copies thereof attached to or accompanying such bill or copy of such bill, shall be taken and preserved as the enrolled bill. If any such amendments are actually incorporated in the bill, or copy of the bill, they may be so incorporated in such manner and by such method as the Clerk of the House of Delegates deems most practicable, except that the Clerk shall not, in order to accomplish such incorporation, require the entire bill to be reprinted, or require any portion of the bill to be reprinted which is not affected by any amendment. Such bill or copy, with the amendments or copies of the amendments as a part of the bill or copy thereof, as made up by the Clerk in accordance with this section, shall be signed by the presiding officers of the Senate and House of Delegates and sent in such form to the Governor for his approval.

The Clerk of the House of Delegates, as Keeper of the Rolls of the Commonwealth, shall not be required to furnish to anyone a copy of an act to codify the laws of the Commonwealth, nor to prepare such an act for publication, nor to furnish to the Comptroller the manuscript of such an act, or any copy thereof. Nor shall the Clerk of the House of Delegates or the Comptroller be required to print, publish or distribute an act to codify the laws of the Commonwealth, as other acts and the joint resolutions of the General Assembly are printed, published or distributed; unless it should be provided in the act to codify the laws, as adopted, that some titles, chapters, articles or sections thereof shall take effect in advance of the remainder of the act, in which event such titles, chapters, articles, and sections of the act, with all amendments which affect them actually incorporated therein, shall be printed and distributed as are other acts of Assembly, but may be separately printed and bound. The Comptroller shall, however, cause to be done any printing that the Clerk of the House of Delegates requires to be done as a part of the process of incorporation of amendments to any bill to codify the laws of the Commonwealth.

History.

1948, p. 587.

§ 30-14.2.
Reenrollment of bills amended in accordance with recommendations of Governor.

The Clerk of the House of Delegates in his capacity as Keeper of the Rolls of the Commonwealth shall reenroll all bills which have been amended in accordance with the recommendation of the Governor, and such reenrolled bills shall be treated in the same manner as provided in Article IV, Section 11 of the Constitution of Virginia for every bill that has passed both houses, before being presented to the Governor for his final action.

History.

1950, p. 7; 1970, c. 170; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 1.

§ 30-14.3.
Keeper of the Rolls authorized to correct typographical errors, etc., in legislation.

The Keeper of the Rolls of the Commonwealth is authorized to correct typographical errors in legislation in the form that they are offered, printed, engrossed, enrolled, or printed after passage; and for the sake of uniformity to change from upper to lower case or vice versa, take out or put in hyphens, change from one word form to two word form or vice versa, to the end that it will not be necessary to encumber the journal with amendments for such purposes.

History.

1950, p. 3; 2016, c. 188.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the 1950 act having assigned no number.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 188 substituted “legislation” for “bills.”

§ 30-14.4.
Deputy clerks of the House of Delegates; certification of acts and resolutions of the General Assembly and other records.

The Clerk of the House of Delegates as Keeper of the Rolls of the Commonwealth may, during the term of his office, appoint deputy clerks, with the approval of the Speaker of the House of Delegates, for furnishing copies of acts and resolutions of the General Assembly and records and papers of the House of Delegates, during the absence of the said Clerk or after his death, resignation or retirement, which copies, being certified by such deputy clerks, shall be evidence for any purpose for which the original would be received, and with as much effect. The Clerk of the House of Delegates making such appointments shall certify the same to the Secretary of the Commonwealth. Any such deputies so appointed, before entering upon the duties of such office, shall take and subscribe the oath of office and file the same with the Secretary of the Commonwealth. Any such deputies may be removed from office by the Clerk of the House of Delegates by written notice to the Secretary of the Commonwealth.

History.

1952, c. 291; 1972, c. 5.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission for better arrangement, the number of this section in the 1952 act having been 10-14.1.

§ 30-15.
Index to Senate journal.

The Clerk of the Senate shall, at the end of each session, prepare an index to the journal of the Senate and the documents printed by its order and deliver the same to the Comptroller.

History.

Code 1919, § 308.

§ 30-15.1.
Deputy clerks of the Senate; certification of records.

The Clerk of the Senate may appoint deputy clerks, for performing the duties of such Clerk and for signing originals, or furnishing copies, of records and papers of the Senate, during the absence of such Clerk or after his death, resignation or retirement, which copies, being certified by any such deputy clerk, shall be evidence for any purpose for which the original would be received, and with as much effect. The Clerk of the Senate making such appointments, shall certify the same to the Secretary of the Commonwealth. Any such deputy so appointed, before entering upon the duties of such office, shall take and subscribe the oath of office and file the same with the Secretary of the Commonwealth. Any such deputy may be removed from office by the Clerk of the Senate by written notice to the Secretary of the Commonwealth.

History.

1954, c. 1; 1972, c. 5.

§ 30-15.1:1.
Use of Senate armorial bearings; penalty.

The armorial bearings adopted by the Senate of Virginia as their official armorial bearings shall carry the following protections on their use:

Only current and former members of the Senate of Virginia and the Clerk of the Senate shall have the authority to utilize such armorial bearings or any facsimile or representations of the armorial bearings.

Representations of such armorial bearings used by former members of the Senate shall be colored blue.

Such use shall not be for any commercial purpose.

Any person violating the provisions of subdivision 1 shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor. Any person violating the provisions of subdivisions 2 and 3 shall be guilty of a Class 4 misdemeanor.

History.

2005, c. 839.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 and Class 4 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 839, cl. 11, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2005.”

§ 30-15.2.
Distribution of Code, supplements and replacement volumes to members of Senate.

The Virginia Code Commission shall, with moneys from the contingent fund of the Senate, acquire and distribute to each member of the Senate, to become his own property, a set of the Code of Virginia, and distribute the supplements and replacement volumes thereto for the period such member serves in the Senate. The Code, supplements and replacement volumes shall be distributed only to those members who request the same. The Code shall not be distributed to members of the Senate who previously have been furnished a set of the Code by the Commonwealth; however, such members shall, upon request, receive from the Virginia Code Commission supplements and replacement volumes to the Code for the period such members serve in the Senate.

History.

1976, c. 131.

§ 30-16.
Books and maps of committees; original bills.

It shall be the duty of the Clerk of the Senate and of the Clerk of the House of Delegates, respectively, to take charge of and keep, during the recess of the General Assembly, all the books and maps belonging to the several standing committees of their respective houses, and to deliver the same at the commencement of each session to the clerks or chairmen of such committees, who shall return them to the Clerks of the two houses at the end of the session. They shall keep all original bills and resolutions offered in their respective houses until the close of the session of the General Assembly next succeeding the session at which they were offered, at which time they shall be transferred to The Library of Virginia for archival deposit.

History.

Code 1919, § 309; 2000, c. 373.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 373 inserted “and resolutions,” and substituted “shall be transferred to The Library of Virginia for archival deposit” for “may be destroyed.”

§ 30-16.1.
Correction of misspellings in bills and resolutions already introduced.

The Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates are hereby empowered to correct misspellings contained in bills and resolutions introduced in their respective houses; provided that the corrections do not in any way alter the bill’s or resolution’s meaning or effect.

History.

1975, c. 8.

§ 30-17.
Alteration, secretion or destruction of pending bills or resolutions.

If any person shall fraudulently erase, alter, secrete or destroy any bill, resolution or amendment to any bill pending before the General Assembly, or either branch thereof, or before any committee of either or of both branches, or any enrolled bill of the General Assembly, or either branch thereof, or shall fraudulently, or with improper intent, endeavor to influence any officer or employee of the General Assembly, or of either branch thereof, to erase, alter, secrete or destroy any such bill, amendment or enrolled bill, he shall be confined in the penitentiary not less than one nor more than five years.

History.

Code 1919, § 310.

§ 30-18.
Repealed by Acts 1972, c. 582.

§ 30-19.
How Constitution amended.

Any amendment or amendments to the Constitution may be proposed in the Senate or House of Delegates by resolution, which shall contain such proposed amendment or amendments prepared in such form as is in accordance with that prescribed by the rules of the House of Delegates and the Senate for deletions and additions of language and be spread at length on the journal of the house in which it is offered, and if it is agreed to by a majority of the members elected thereto with ayes and noes taken thereon, it shall be communicated to the other house where it shall be dealt with in like manner, and when so agreed to by both houses, it shall be enrolled as provided by law and signed by the President of the Senate and Speaker of the House of Delegates. Such amendment or amendments shall thereupon stand referred to the General Assembly at its first regular session held after the next general election of members of the House of Delegates. If at such regular session the proposed amendment or amendments shall be agreed to by a majority vote of all the members elected to each house, the same shall be submitted to the people, not sooner than ninety days after final passage, by a bill or resolution introduced for such purpose, and if the people shall approve and ratify such amendment or amendments by the majority of the electors qualified to vote for the members of the General Assembly voting thereon, such amendment or amendments shall become a part of the Constitution.

History.

Code 1919, § 312; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 129; 1973, c. 57.

Cross references.

For constitutional provision, see Va. Const., Art. XII, § 1.

§§ 30-19.01,
30-19.02.
Repealed by Acts 1984, c. 202.

§ 30-19.03.
Estimates to be prepared for legislation affecting local government expenditures and revenues.

Whenever any legislative bill requiring a net additional expenditure by any county, city, or town, or whenever any legislative bill requiring a net reduction of revenues by any county, city, or town, is filed during any session of the General Assembly, the Commission on Local Government shall investigate and prepare an estimate setting forth, to the extent practicable, the additional expenditures or reduction of revenues, if any, to be required of the affected localities in event of enactment of such legislation.

A bill shall be deemed to require an expenditure if it has the effect of requiring any county, city, or town to (i) perform or administer a new or expanded program or service, (ii) maintain an existing program or service at a specified level of spending or delivery, (iii) assume or incur administrative costs in support of a state or state-related program, or (iv) furnish capital facilities for state or state-related activities.

For purposes of this section, “net additional expenditure” means the cost anticipated to be incurred annually, less any revenues receivable on account of the program or service from fees charged recipients of the program or service, state or federal aid paid specifically and categorically in connection with the program or service, new or increased local sources of revenue authorized and designated specifically to offset the cost of the program or service, and any offsetting savings resulting from the reduction or elimination of any program or service directly attributable to the performance of the required program or service.

A bill shall be deemed to require a net reduction of revenues if it has the effect of requiring any county, city, or town to (i) relinquish an existing or potential source of local revenue by classification or exclusion or (ii) diminish an existing or potential source of revenue by classification or exclusion.

For the purposes of this section, “net reduction of revenues” means the reduction anticipated in local revenues, including, but not limited to, general levies, special levies, revenues received pursuant to §§

58.1-605

and

58.1-606

and administrative and user fees, to be incurred annually, less any new local revenues receivable and any offsetting savings resulting from the reduction of local revenues, caused by the classification or exclusion being proposed.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to a reduction in local revenues that is required or arises from a court order or judgment, nor to a revenue reduction that is adopted at the option of any county, city, or town under a law that is permissive rather than mandatory, nor to a revenue reduction that is the result of a measure providing tax relief on a statewide basis.

The Division of Legislative Services shall examine all bills and joint resolutions filed during any legislative session for the purpose of identifying and forwarding to the Commission on Local Government those bills requiring the preparation of fiscal estimates pursuant to this section and those joint resolutions calling for a study of local government revenues or expenditures.

The Department of Planning and Budget and the Department of Taxation are authorized to submit legislative bills to the Commission on Local Government to prepare local fiscal estimates.

As soon thereafter as may be practicable, the Commission on Local Government shall forward copies of such estimates to the Clerk of the House of Delegates for transmittal to each patron of the legislation and to the chairman of each committee of the General Assembly to consider the same.

All departments, agencies of government, the Division of Legislative Services, and all local governmental units of the Commonwealth are directed to make available such information and assistance as the Commission on Local Government may request in preparing the estimates required by this section.

History.

1979, c. 257; 1980, cc. 747, 749; 1995, c. 743; 1999, c. 1016; 2010, c. 410; 2014, c. 807.

Cross references.

As to the Commission on Local Government, generally, see §

15.2-2900

et seq.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 410 rewrote the section.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 807, in the first paragraph, twice inserted “legislative” preceding “bill”; in the seventh paragraph, inserted “and joint resolutions” and “and those joint resolutions calling for a study of local government revenues or expenditures” and added the eighth paragraph.

§§ 30-19.03:1,
§§ 30-19.03:1,
30-19.03 1.1.
Repealed by Acts 2010, c. 410, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §§ 30-19.03:1 and 30-19.03:1.1, relating to bills requiring net additional expenditures by local governments to be filed by first calendar day of session, and bills requiring net reduced revenues by local governments to be filed by first calendar day of session, respectively, were derived from Acts 1995, c. 743; 1996, c. 685; and Acts 1999, c. 1016, respectively.

§ 30-19.03:1.2.
Unemployment compensation bills affecting net revenues of the Commonwealth.

The Virginia Employment Commission, in consultation with the Department of Planning and Budget, shall prepare a statement reflecting the projected impact on the solvency level of the unemployment trust fund and the average increase in state unemployment tax liability of employers on a per-employee basis over the ensuing eight years that would result from the enactment of any bill that enhances the benefits payable to an individual pursuant to Title 60.2.

No bill enhancing the benefits payable to an individual pursuant to Title 60.2 shall be considered by the General Assembly at a regular session unless the bill contains a statement prepared in accordance with subsection A as a second or final enactment clause in the bill.

For the purposes of this section, legislation that “enhances the benefits payable to an individual” includes any legislation that would facilitate the receipt, or increase the amount, of unemployment compensation benefits that an otherwise qualified claimant is eligible to receive on an annual basis.

History.

2004, c. 895; 2011, c. 302.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 302 substituted “projected impact on the solvency level of the unemployment trust fund and the average increase in state unemployment tax liability of employers on a per-employee basis over the ensuing eight years that would result from the enactment of” for “potential revenue losses, in the form of decreased tax revenues, attributable to” in subsection A; deleted “revenue loss” following “bill contains a” in subsection B; and substituted “that ‘enhances the benefits payable to an individual’ includes” for “ ‘enhancing the benefits payable to a claimant’ includes” in subsection C.

§ 30-19.03:1.3.
Evaluations to be prepared for legislation increasing or beginning regulation of an occupation.

For the purposes of this section, “regulation” means any statement of general application, having the force of law and affecting the rights or conduct of any person, adopted by an agency in accordance with the authority conferred on it by the Constitution and applicable statutes of the Commonwealth.

When any legislative bill requiring the Department of Professional and Occupational Regulation to increase or begin regulation of an occupation is filed during any session of the General Assembly, the chairman of the committee having jurisdiction over the proposal shall request that the Board for Professional and Occupational Regulation (the Board) prepare an evaluation of the legislation using the criteria outlined in §

54.1-311

.

Upon receipt of such a request, the Board shall prepare the evaluation and shall forward copies of such evaluation to the Clerk of the House of Delegates for House bills and to the Clerk of the Senate for Senate bills no later than November 1 of the same year for requests received during a regular session of the General Assembly or as soon as practicable for requests received during a special session of the General Assembly for transmittal to each patron of the legislation and to the chairman of each committee of the General Assembly to consider the same.

All departments, agencies of government, and the Division of Legislative Services are directed to make available such information and assistance as the Board may request in preparing the evaluations required by this section.

History.

2019, c. 812; 2022, c. 647.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 647 in subsection B, inserted “chairman of the committee having jurisdiction over the proposal shall request that the” and deleted “shall” preceding “prepare”; in subsection C, deleted the former first paragraph, which read “The Division of Legislative Services shall examine all bills filed during any legislative session for the purpose of identifying and forwarding to the Board those bills requiring an evaluation pursuant to this section”; and in the current first paragraph, substituted “Upon receipt of such a request, the Board shall prepare the evaluation and” for “As soon thereafter as may be practicable, the Board” and “evaluation” for “evaluations” and inserted “no later than November 1 of the same year for requests received during a regular session of the General Assembly or as soon as practicable for requests received during a special session of the General Assembly.”

§ 30-19.03:2.
Legislative summaries.

Any legislative summary associated with a bill, joint resolution or resolution, including any summary appearing on the face of such legislation, shall not constitute a part of the legislation considered, agreed to, or enacted and shall not be used to indicate or infer legislative intent.

History.

1997, c. 375.

§ 30-19.04.
Repealed by Acts 2003, c. 1032, cl. 2, effective January 1, 2003.

Editor’s note.

Former § 30-19.04, regarding legislative designation of associations, organizations, etc., exempt from taxation and requiring resolution of local governing body, was derived from Acts 1980, c. 327; 1987, c. 338; 1988, c. 257; 1993, c. 649.